Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5987.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 23. (1) The commissioner shall not issue a license to a person to engage in business exclusively as a lottery sales agent. Before issuing a lottery sales agent license, the commissioner shall consider factors such as the financial responsibility and security of the person and his or her the person's business or activity, the accessibility of his or her the person's place of business or activity to the public, the sufficiency of existing licenses to serve the public convenience, and the volume of expected sales. (2) The commissioner shall issue an initial or renewal lottery sales agent license not later than 90 days after the applicant files a completed application. Receipt of the application is considered the date the application is received by any agency or department of this state. If the commissioner determines that the application is incomplete, the commissioner shall notify the applicant in writing, or make information electronically available, within 30 days after receipt of the incomplete application, describing the deficiency and requesting the additional information. The 90-day period is tolled upon notification by the commissioner of a deficiency until the date the requested information is received by the commissioner. The determination of the completeness of an application does not operate as an approval of the application for the lottery sales agent license and does not confer eligibility of an applicant determined otherwise ineligible for issuance of a lottery sales agent license. (3) If the commissioner fails to issue or deny a lottery sales agent license within the time required by this section, the commissioner shall return the license fee and shall reduce the license fee for the applicant's next renewal application, if any, by 15%. The failure to issue a lottery sales agent license within the time required under this section does not allow the commissioner to otherwise delay the processing of the application, and that application, upon completion, shall must be placed in sequence with other completed applications received at that same time. The commissioner shall not discriminate against an applicant in the processing of the application based upon on the fact that the license fee was refunded or discounted under this subsection. (4) The commissioner shall submit a report by December 1 of each year to the standing committees and appropriations subcommittees of the senate and house of representatives concerned with gaming issues. The commissioner shall include all of the following information in the report concerning the preceding fiscal year: (a) The number of initial and renewal applications the commissioner received and completed within the 90-day time period described in subsection (2). (b) The number of applications denied. (c) The number of applicants not issued a lottery sales agent license within the 90-day time period and the amount of money returned to licensees and applicants under subsection (3). (5) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a person licensed as a lottery sales agent may sell lottery tickets and shares. A person lawfully engaged in nongovernmental business on state property may be licensed as a lottery sales agent. (6) A lottery sales agent license is not assignable or transferable. (7) A licensed lottery sales agent or his or her the agent's employee may sell lottery tickets or shares only on the premises stated in the lottery sales agent license. A licensed lottery sales agent who that violates this subsection is, at the commissioner's discretion, subject to 1 or more of the following: (a) Probation for not more than 2 years. (b) A fine of not more than $1,000.00. (c) Removal of his or her the agent's lottery terminal. (8) The commissioner may require a bond from a licensed lottery sales agent in an amount provided in rules promulgated under this act. (9) A licensed lottery sales agent shall display his or her the agent's license or a copy of the license conspicuously in accordance with rules promulgated under this act. (10) The commissioner may suspend or revoke the license of an a lottery sales agent who that violates this act or a rule promulgated under this act. The commissioner may suspend the license of a lottery sales agent that violates the cryptocurrency kiosk prohibition act in accordance with section 7 of the cryptocurrency kiosk prohibition act. (11) For purposes of terminal placement, the commissioner shall take into account with equal emphasis both of the following: (a) The total instant game sales for the 3 months immediately preceding a market evaluation. (b) The need to maximize net lottery revenues from the total number of terminals placed. (12) A licensed lottery sales agent shall not offer to give or give any money or other thing of value to the holder of a lottery ticket or share for winning the lottery, other than the prize if payment of the prize by the agent is authorized by the commissioner. (13) As used in this section: (a) "Completed application" means an application complete on its face and submitted with any applicable licensing fees and any other information, records, approval, security, or similar item required by law or rule from a local unit of government, a federal agency, or a private entity but not from another department or agency of this state. (b) "Person" means an individual, association, corporation, club, trust, estate, society, company, joint stock company, receiver, trustee, referee, or other person acting in a fiduciary or representative capacity who is appointed by a court, or any combination of individuals. Person includes a department, commission, agency, or instrumentality of the state, including a county, city, village, or township and an agency or instrumentality of the county, city, village, or township. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act takes effect 90 days after the date it is enacted into law. Enacting section 2. This amendatory act does not take effect unless Senate Bill No. ____ (request no. S06776'26) or House Bill No. 5986 (request no. H06776'26) of the 103rd Legislature is enacted into law.